Utah statutes.
76-10-505.5.   Possession of a dangerous weapon, firearm, or short barreled shotgun on or about school premises -- Penalties.

(1)  As used in this section, "on or about school premises" means:

(a) (i)  in a public or private elementary or secondary school; or

(ii)  on the grounds of any of those schools;

(b) (i)  in a public or private institution of higher education; or

(ii)  on the grounds of a public or private institution of higher education; and

(iii) (A)  inside the building where a preschool or child care is being held, if the entire building is being used for the operation of the preschool or child care; or

(B)  if only a portion of a building is being used to operate a preschool or child care, in that room or rooms where the preschool or child care operation is being held.

(2)  A person may not possess any dangerous weapon, firearm, or short barreled shotgun, as those terms are defined in Section 76-10-501, at a place that the person knows, or has reasonable cause to believe, is on or about school premises as defined in this section.

(3) (a)  Possession of a dangerous weapon on or about school premises is a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  Possession of a firearm or short barreled shotgun on or about school premises is a class A misdemeanor.

(4)  This section does not apply if:

(a)  the person is authorized to possess a firearm as provided under Section 53-5-704, 53-5-705, 76-10-511, or 76-10-523, or as otherwise authorized by law;

(b)  the possession is approved by the responsible school administrator;

(c)  the item is present or to be used in connection with a lawful, approved activity and is in the possession or under the control of the person responsible for its possession or use; or

(d)  the possession is:

(i)  at the person's place of residence or on the person's property; or

(ii)  in any vehicle lawfully under the person's control, other than a vehicle owned by the school or used by the school to transport students.

(5)  This section does not prohibit prosecution of a more serious weapons offense that may occur on or about school premises.



Amended by Chapter 301, 2013 General Session

